District of Columbia statutes.
28-4606

Enforcement.

(a)

Except as provided in this chapter, no registration pursuant to section 3 [§ 28-4602] shall be suspended or revoked without a hearing pursuant to title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (“APA”), approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; § 2-501 et seq.).

(b)

In any proceeding pursuant to this chapter, the burden of proving an exemption or exception is upon the person who claims the exemption or exception.

(c)

This section does not prohibit the enforcement by any person of a right provided by this chapter or any other applicable District or federal law, rule, or regulation.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-236, § 7, 38 DCR 306
1981 Ed., § 28-4606.